Arkansas, session 2025, HB1960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-706, concerning lists of motor
vehicle licenses for the purpose of property tax assessment, is amended to
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) As used in this section, "vehicle owner" means, for purposes of a
motor vehicle that is leased pursuant to a contract providing for the use of
*JLL377*
04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1960
the motor vehicle by the lessee for a period of more than thirty (30) days,
the lessee of the motor vehicle.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-903, concerning the requirement that
the owner of property list the property for assessment, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) As used in this section, "owner" means, for purposes of a motor
vehicle that is leased pursuant to a contract providing for the use of the
motor vehicle by the lessee for a period of more than thirty (30) days, the
lessee of the motor vehicle.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1408(a)(1), concerning the time for
the assessment and payment of personal property taxes, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1)(A) A taxpayer shall annually assess his or her tangible
personal property for ad valorem taxes during the period from January 1
through May 31.
(B) A taxpayer's tangible personal property includes a
motor vehicle that is leased pursuant to a contract providing for the use of
the motor vehicle by the taxpayer as the lessee for a period of more than
thirty (30) days.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-14-1015(a), concerning the payment of
personal property taxes and the listing for assessment required for motor
vehicles, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The owner of every vehicle subject to registration in Arkansas
shall assess the vehicle with the county tax assessor in the county where
required by law and within the time required by law.
(2) As used in this section, "owner" means, for purposes of a
vehicle that is leased pursuant to a contract providing for the use of the
vehicle by the lessee for a period of more than thirty (30) days, the lessee
of the vehicle.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-73-301(a), concerning the limitation on
the levy of a local sales or use tax, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Any municipal or county sales or use tax levied pursuant to the
04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1960
laws of this state shall be levied and collected only on the first two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) of gross receipts, gross proceeds, or
sales price on the sale of a:
(1)(A) Motor vehicle;
(2)(B) Aircraft;
(3)(C) Watercraft;
(4)(D) Modular home;
(5)(E) Manufactured home; and
(6)(F) Mobile home.
(2) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1) of this
section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax shall
be:
(A) For the purpose of determining the application of the
limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, applied to the
aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or lease; and
(B) Collected:
(i) On the first periodic payment due on the sale or
lease; or
(ii) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-74-220(a), concerning the maximum tax
limitation on the levy of a county sales and use tax for capital
improvements, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1) of this
section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax shall
be:
(A) For the purpose of determining the application of the
limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, applied to the
aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or lease; and
(B) Collected:
(i) On the first periodic payment due on the sale or
lease; or
(ii) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1960
SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-74-320(a), concerning the maximum tax
limitation on the levy of a county sales tax for capital improvements, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1) of this
section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax shall
be:
(A) For the purpose of determining the application of the
limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, applied to the
aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or lease; and
(B) Collected:
(i) On the first periodic payment due on the sale or
lease; or
(ii) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-74-412(a)(1), concerning the maximum tax
limitation on the levy of a county sales and use tax for counties without an
existing tax, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of
this section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax
shall be:
(i) For the purpose of determining the application
of the limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section,
applied to the aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or
lease; and
(ii) Collected:
(a) On the first periodic payment due on the
sale or lease; or
(b) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 26-74-612(a), concerning the maximum tax
limitation on the levy of a county sales and use tax for capital
improvements, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1) of this
section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax shall
04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1960
be:
(A) For the purpose of determining the application of the
limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, applied to the
aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or lease; and
(B) Collected:
(i) On the first periodic payment due on the sale or
lease; or
(ii) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 26-75-222(a), concerning the maximum tax
limitation on the levy of a municipal sales and use tax for capital
improvements, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1) of this
section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax shall
be:
(A) For the purpose of determining the application of the
limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, applied to the
aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or lease; and
(B) Collected:
(i) On the first periodic payment due on the sale or
lease; or
(ii) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 26-75-319(a), concerning the maximum tax
limitation on the levy of a municipal sales tax for capital improvements, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1) of this
section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax shall
be:
(A) For the purpose of determining the application of the
limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, applied to the
aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or lease; and
(B) Collected:
(i) On the first periodic payment due on the sale or
04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1960
lease; or
(ii) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 26-81-104(a)(2), concerning the amount of
the tax levied under the Multicounty Airport and Riverport Financing Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Any tax levied pursuant to this chapter shall be levied
and collected only on the first two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) of
gross receipts, gross proceeds, or sales price from the sale of a:
(i) Motor vehicle;
(ii) Aircraft;
(iii) Watercraft;
(iv) Modular home;
(v) Manufactured home; or
(vi) Mobile home.
(B) A vendor shall be responsible for collecting and
remitting the tax only on the first two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) of gross receipts, gross proceeds, or sales price from the sale of
a:
(i) Motor vehicle;
(ii) Aircraft;
(iii) Watercraft;
(iv) Modular home;
(v) Manufactured home; or
(vi) Mobile home.
(C) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(2)(A) of
this section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax
shall be:
(i) For the purpose of determining the application
of the limitation provided under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section,
applied to the aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or
lease; and
(ii) Collected:
(a) On the first periodic payment due on the
sale or lease; or
04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1960
(b) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.
(D) A vendor collecting, reporting, and remitting the
county sales or use taxes shall show county taxes as a separate entry on the
tax report form.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 26-82-115(a), concerning the maximum tax
limitation on the levy of a sales and use tax under the Local Sales and Use
Tax Economic Development Project Funding Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A sales and use tax levied under this chapter shall be levied
and collected only on the first two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) of
gross receipts, gross proceeds, or sales price on the sale of:
(1)(A) Motor vehicles;
(2)(B) Aircraft;
(3)(C) Watercraft;
(4)(D) Modular homes;
(5)(E) Manufactured homes; or
(6)(F) Mobile homes.
(2) If a sale or lease subject to subdivision (a)(1) of this
section involves periodic payments, the applicable sales and use tax shall
be:
(A) For the purpose of determining the application of the
limitation provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, applied to the
aggregate amount of all periodic payments due on the sale or lease; and
(B) Collected:
(i) On the first periodic payment due on the sale or
lease; or
(ii) Evenly distributed and collected on each
separate periodic payment due on the sale or lease.

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective dates.
(a) Sections 1-4 of this act are effective for assessment years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 5-13 of this act are effective on the first day of the
calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.

04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1960
/s/Wardlaw



































04-09-2025 18:26:21 JLL377